Oklahoma, session 2026, SB89.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 840-2.20, as


last amended by Section 172, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 840-2.20), is amended to read as follows:


Section 840-2.20. A. The Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services shall promulgate such emergency and



Req. No. 515 Page 1


permanent rules regarding leave and holiday leave as are necessary


to assist the state and its agencies.


The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services, in adopting new rules, amending rules and repealing rules,


shall ensure that the following provisions are incorporated:


1. Eligible employees who enter on duty or who are reinstated


after a break in service shall receive leave benefits in accordance


with the schedule outlined below. Leave shall be accrued based upon


hours worked, paid leave, and holidays, but excluding overtime, not


to exceed the total possible work hours for the pay period. Years


of service shall be based on cumulative periods of employment


calculated in the manner that cumulative service is determined for


longevity purposes pursuant to Section 840-2.18 of this title.


Employees may accumulate more than the maximum annual leave


accumulation limits shown in the schedule below provided that such


excess is used during the same calendar year in which it accrues or


within twelve (12) months of the date on which it accrues, at the


discretion of the appointing authority. If an employee whose job


duties include providing fire protection services, law enforcement


services or services with the Department of Corrections is unable to


use excess leave as provided for in this paragraph because the


employee’s request for leave is denied by the employee’s appointing


authority and the denial of leave is due to extraordinary


circumstances such that taking leave could pose a threat to public

Req. No. 515 Page 2


safety, health or welfare, the employee shall receive compensation


at the employee’s regular rate of pay for the amount of excess leave


the employee is unable to use. Such compensation shall be paid at


the end of the time period during which the excess leave was


required to have been used;


2. On and after the effective date of this act July 1, 2023,


the following accrual rates and accumulation limits apply to


eligible employees as follows:


ACCRUAL RATES ACCUMULATION


LIMITS


Cumulative


Years of Annual Sick Annual


Service Leave Leave Leave


Persons employed 0-5 yrs = 15 day/yr 15 days/yr 30 days


5-10 yrs = 18 day/yr 15 days/yr 80 days


10-20 yrs = 20 day/yr 15 days/yr 80 days


over 20 yrs = 25 day/yr 15 days/yr 80 days


Following an emergency declaration as described in Section 683.8


of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the accumulation limits for


annual leave shall temporarily increase and shall carryover to the


end of the fiscal year following the year in which the emergency


declaration ended.


All annual leave that accrued or expired during the period of


the emergency declarations issued by the Governor in 2020 and 2021

Req. No. 515 Page 3


in response to the novel coronavirus (COVID-19) shall carry over to


the end of the fiscal year following the year in which the emergency


declaration ended regardless of regulatory provisions that establish


a maximum amount of annual leave that may be accumulated by an


employee of this state. Expired annual leave governed by this


subsection shall be reinstated as of May 7, 2021, and accumulation


limits for annual leave shall not apply to amounts accrued or


reinstated pursuant to this subsection. Eligibility for


reinstatement of annual leave is limited to employees currently


employed by this state on May 7, 2021;


3. Temporary employees and other limited term employees are


ineligible to accrue, use, or be paid for sick leave and annual


leave. Such employees shall be eligible for paid holiday leave at


the discretion of the appointing authority;


4. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection,


employees shall not be entitled to retroactive accumulation of leave


as a result of amendments to this section;


5. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall assist agencies in developing policies to prevent


violence in state government workplaces without abridging the rights


of state employees. Such policies shall include a paid


administrative leave provision as a cooling-off period which the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services is


authorized to provide pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act.

Req. No. 515 Page 4


Such leave shall not be charged to annual or sick leave


accumulations;


6. State employees who terminated their employment in the state


service on or after October 1, 1992, may be eligible to have sick


leave accrued at the time of termination of employment restored if


they return to state employment provided that the state employees’


enter-on-duty dates for reemployment occur on or before two (2)


years after their termination of employment and they are eligible to


accrue sick leave before the two (2) years expire;


7. Employees who are volunteer firefighters pursuant to the


Oklahoma Volunteer Firefighters Act and who are called to fight a


fire shall not have to use any accrued leave or need to make up any


time due to the performance of their volunteer firefighter duties;


8. Employees who are reserve municipal police officers pursuant


to Section 34-101 of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who miss


work in performing their duties in cases of emergency shall not have


to use any accrued leave or need to make up any time due to the


performance of their reserve municipal police officer duties;


9. Employees who are reserve deputy sheriffs pursuant to


Section 547 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who miss work


in performing their duties in case of emergency shall not have to


use any accrued leave or need to make up any time due to the


performance of their reserve deputy sheriff duties;



Req. No. 515 Page 5


10. For purposes of the computation required by this section,


any service performed by a person during which the person received


compensation for duties performed for the state shall be counted if


payment for such service was made using state fiscal resources. The


provisions of this section shall not apply to elected or appointed


justices or judges, including special judges, who perform service in


the trial or appellate courts. The provisions of this section shall


apply to persons who perform services as an administrative law judge


within the executive department and employees of the judicial


branch; and


11. Eligible employees shall be entitled to paid maternity


leave as provided for in Section 840-2.20D of this title.


B. Nothing in law is intended to prevent or discourage an


appointing authority from disciplining or terminating an employee


due to abuse of leave benefits or absenteeism. Appointing


authorities are encouraged to consider attendance of employees in


making decisions regarding promotions, pay increases, and


discipline.


C. Upon the transfer of a function in state government to an


entity outside state government, employees may, with the agreement


of the outside entity, waive any payment for leave accumulations to


which the employee is entitled and authorize the transfer of the


leave accumulations or a portion thereof to the outside entity.



Req. No. 515 Page 6


D. All permanent employees of the state shall be eligible to


carry over a maximum of six hundred forty (640) hours of annual


leave each year. Additionally, all employees shall be paid up to a


maximum of six hundred forty (640) hours of annual leave upon


separation from state service.


E. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services, in


conjunction with the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System,


shall establish a mechanism for vested employees retiring from state


service to elect to transfer unused sick and annual leave in excess


of the limits set forth in this section to be used for the retiree


and his or her dependents’ benefit allowance upon retirement.


Annual leave transferred under this subsection shall be transferred


at the standard benefit allowance rate for the calendar year.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 913, as


amended by Section 3, Chapter 146, O.S.L. 2023 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 913), is amended to read as follows:


Section 913. A. Prior service shall be credited as follows:


1. A member shall receive full credit for employment with any


participating employer prior to the entry date of his or her


employer whether or not continuous and whether or not he or she was


employed with a participating employer on such entry date, provided


that any member who has retired before the passage of Section 901 et


seq. of this title, shall not receive retirement benefits


retroactively for such prior service. Provided, that at such time

Req. No. 515 Page 7


that an employer becomes a participating employer on or after


January 1, 1965, and before January 1, 1975, each member and each


retirant, upon making proper written application therefor, shall


receive prior service credit for service with such employer in the


same manner as if such participating employer had been a


participating employer on the date first eligible to become a


participating employer; and increased benefits attributable to such


increased prior service credit shall commence with the next monthly


benefit payment due following receipt and approval of such


application by the Board of Trustees. No prior service shall be


granted, however, for periods of service in which the employee made


contributions which he or she subsequently withdrew, unless he or


she has complied with the provisions of subsection (5) of Section


917 of this title. The burden of proof regarding prior service


shall be with the member and shall be documented in such manner as


the Board may direct;


2. Any member who was employed in an institution of higher


learning by a State Board of Regents or who was employed by an


Oklahoma school district prior to July 1, 1943, may receive prior


service credit under Section 901 et seq. of this title for the


period of time they were so employed;


3. Any member who served in the Armed Forces of the United


States with military service, as defined in paragraph (23) of


Section 902 of this title, prior to membership in the Oklahoma

Req. No. 515 Page 8


Public Employees Retirement System shall be granted prior service


credit, not to exceed five (5) years, for those periods of active


military service during which he or she was a war veteran. For a


member of the System hired on or after July 1, 2003, if the military


service credit authorized by this paragraph is used to compute the


retirement benefit of the member and the member retires from the


System, such military service credit shall not be used to compute


the retirement benefit in any other retirement system created


pursuant to the Oklahoma Statutes and the member may receive credit


for such service only in the retirement system from which the member


first retires;


4. An elective state, county, city or town official who is


ineligible for membership as a result of any applicable state law or


constitutional provision making him or her ineligible solely because


of his or her being such an official at the time of his or her


eligibility for membership at the time his or her employer becomes a


participating employer shall nevertheless not forfeit the prior


service credit to which he or she would be entitled except for such


ineligibility, provided that he or she either:


a. becomes an employee of a participating employer within


four (4) calendar months of the expiration of his or


her term of office current at the time of his or her


eligibility except for his or her being an elective


state or county official,

Req. No. 515 Page 9


b. within a period of four (4) years after the expiration


of his or her term of office current at the time of


his or her eligibility except for his or her being an


elective state or county official, is elected as a


state or county official and thereupon becomes a


member of the System, or


c. has completed ten (10) years of credited service as of


the date of his or her eligibility for membership


except for his or her being an elective state or


county official;


5. Beginning July 1, 1965, all employees of the Department of


Human Services shall participate in the Oklahoma Public Employees


Retirement System to the same extent as other employees of


participating employers in such System. Provided, that any employee


performing teaching services in the Oklahoma School for the Deaf or


the Oklahoma School for the Blind may elect to participate in the


Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma in lieu of the Oklahoma


Public Employees Retirement System; and any other employee at each


such institution or any other institution under the jurisdiction of


the Department of Human Services, participating in the Teachers’


Retirement System of Oklahoma, may elect to continue to participate


in such System in lieu of the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement


System. All employees who shall have participated in the Teachers’


Retirement System of Oklahoma and not continuing therein shall have

Req. No. 515 Page 10


the right to withdraw their membership from the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma on the same terms as other members withdrawing


from such System before retirement. Provided, all persons employed


at the Oklahoma School for the Blind and Oklahoma School for the


Deaf on June 30, 1965, who became subject to the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System, on July 1, 1965, shall receive credit


for prior service and be eligible for participation, regardless of


age;


6. A member employed as a temporary employee by the Legislative


Service Bureau or its predecessors, the Senate or the House of


Representatives for the full duration of a regular legislative


session prior to the member’s eligibility for membership in the


System shall receive six (6) months of prior service credit for each


such full regular legislative session if the employee is employed by


the Legislative Service Bureau or its predecessors, the Senate or


the House of Representatives as either a full-time or temporary


employee for a minimum of six (6) full regular legislative sessions


beginning January 1, 1983. For purposes of this subsection, the


determination of whether an employee is employed for the full


duration of a regular legislative session shall be made by the


Legislative Service Bureau if such employee is employed by the


Legislative Service Bureau, the Senate if such employee is employed


by the Senate, or by the House of Representatives if such employee


is employed by the House of Representatives;

Req. No. 515 Page 11


7. A member of the System shall receive prior service credit


for any years of service after January 1, 1975, the member had with


a participating employer if the member is not receiving or eligible


to receive such prior service credit for the same time in any other


state or county retirement system authorized by law. To receive the


service credit, the member shall pay the amount determined by the


Board pursuant to Section 913.5 of this title; and


8. Any member who is a state employee and receives temporary


total disability benefits during the period of absence with a


participating employer due to a work-related injury or illness


incurred while engaged in a governmental function for the


participating employer pursuant to the Administrative Workers’


Compensation Act shall receive credit for participating service


during such period of absence subject to the following requirements:


a. the member was employed by the participating employer


immediately prior to and during the period of absence,


b. the member must notify the System in writing not later


than four (4) months after the member’s return to his


or her job duties with the participating employer, or


termination of employment with the participating


employer, or termination of the temporary total


disability benefits, whichever is earlier, of the


member’s desire to receive participating service


credit for the period of absence,

Req. No. 515 Page 12


c. the participating employer must certify to the System


in writing the dates during which temporary total


disability benefits payments were paid to the member,


and


d. the member and the participating employer shall each


pay their respective contributions required for the


period of absence without interest within sixty (60)


days of invoicing by the System, or with interest of


seven and one-half percent (7 1/2%) compounded


annually if paid after the sixty (60) days.


B. Participating service shall be credited as follows:


1. A member shall receive credit for participating service with


a participating employer in accordance with the rules and


regulations established by the Board; provided, however, that a


member who is not a full-time employee shall receive prorated credit


for actual hours worked;


2. Leaves of absence shall not count as a break in continuous


employment provided the member leaves his or her accumulated


contribution on deposit with the fund; however, the leaves of


absence shall not be credited except that involuntary furloughs


established by Office of Management and Enterprise Services rules,


involuntary furloughs of employees of a district attorney conducted


in substantial compliance with the rules of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services as certified by the District Attorneys

Req. No. 515 Page 13


Council, involuntary furloughs of employees pursuant to a furlough


plan adopted by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate or the


Speaker of the House of Representatives as authorized in Section


840-5.1 of this title and involuntary furloughs of employees


authorized by the Oklahoma Supreme Court shall be credited;


3. Any member who has served in the Armed Forces of the United


States, as defined in paragraph (23) of Section 902 of this title,


shall be granted participating service for those periods of active


military service during which he or she was a war veteran provided


this service is immediately preceded by a period of employment with


a participating employer and is followed by return to employment as


an employee with the same or another participating employer within


ninety (90) days immediately following discharge from such military


service provided the member leaves his or her accumulated


contributions on deposit with the fund. Provided, on or after the


effective date of this act November 1, 2023, service granted under


this section and service purchased under Section 913.8 of this title


shall not exceed five (5) years;


4. A period of total disability under the System immediately


followed by employment with a participating employer, shall not


count as a break in continuous employment; provided, that such


periods while not employed shall not be credited except that


involuntary furloughs established by Office of Management and


Enterprise Services Rule 6.13, shall be credited;

Req. No. 515 Page 14


5. Termination of employment with a participating employer


followed by employment with the same or another participating


employer within four (4) calendar months shall not constitute a


break in continuous employment; provided, that such period while not


employed shall not be credited as participating service;


6. Provided, however, that all employee contributions required


by Section 901 et seq. of this title made by employees prior to June


30, 1977, will entitle the employee to additional years of


participating service in accordance with the following schedule.


Employee accumulated contributions:


More than $1.00 up to $500 = 1 year participating service


More than $500 up to $1,000 = 2 years participating service


More than $1,000 up to $1,500 = 3 years participating service


More than $1,500 up to $2,000 = 4 years participating service


More than $2,000 = 5 years participating service


In no event shall the employee be entitled to more than five (5)


additional years of participating service as provided hereunder.


Provided further, that upon termination of employment prior to


retirement, the accumulated contributions will be credited as above


indicated to establish a vested benefit if so elected by any such


employee; and


7. a. The total participating service credit of a member who


retires or terminates employment and elects a vested


benefit shall include not to exceed one hundred thirty

Req. No. 515 Page 15


(130) days of unused sick leave accumulated subsequent


to August 1, 1959, during the member’s employment with


any participating employer. Such credit shall be


added in terms of whole months. Twenty (20) days of


unused sick leave shall equal one (1) month for


purposes of participating service credit. If unused


sick leave entitles a member to an additional year of


service credit, the member’s employer shall reimburse


the System for the cost of funding the additional


benefit. For members who join the System on or after


November 1, 2012, if unused sick leave entitles a


member to any additional service credit, the member’s


employer shall reimburse the System for the cost of


funding the additional benefit. Each participating


employer shall provide the System with adequate and


timely information necessary to determine additional


benefits and its cost under this paragraph. This


subparagraph shall apply to members retiring or


vesting on or after July 1, 1984.


b. For members who join the System on or after November


1, 2012, unused sick leave as set forth in


subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be credited at


the same rate but not used to round up to another


year. Instead, any additional months of unused sick

Req. No. 515 Page 16


leave credit shall be added to other service credit


without rounding.


c. Members who accrue unused sick leave may, pursuant to


Section 840-2.20 of this title, elect to transfer such


leave for the purpose of converting the unused leave


to the member’s retirement insurance benefit allowance


in lieu of purchasing service credit under this


subparagraph.


C. In determining the number of years of credited service, a


fractional year of six (6) months or more shall be considered as one


(1) year, and less than six (6) months shall be disregarded. For


members who join the System on or after November 1, 2012, the number


of years of credited service shall be based on actual years and full


months of credited service without rounding up or down.


D. A member may receive credit for those years of credited


service accumulated by the member while a member of the Oklahoma


Firefighters Pension and Retirement System, the Oklahoma Police


Pension and Retirement System, the Uniform Retirement System for


Justices and Judges, the Oklahoma Law Enforcement Retirement System,


or the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma, if the member is not


receiving or eligible to receive retirement credit or benefits from


such service in any other public retirement system. To receive the


service credit, the member shall pay the amount determined by the


Board pursuant to Section 913.5 of this title.

Req. No. 515 Page 17


E. A member may receive credit for those years of service


accumulated by the member as an elected official if the member is


not receiving or eligible to receive retirement credit or benefits


from such service in any public retirement system. Prior to January


1, 1991, to receive the service credit, the member shall pay to the


Board for each year of service purchased pursuant to this subsection


a sum equal to the employee and employer contribution rate that


would have been applicable to the member as determined by the Board


and interest not to exceed five percent (5%), and effective January


1, 1991, to receive the service credit, the member shall pay the


amount determined by the Board pursuant to Section 913.5 of this


title.


F. Effective December 12, 1994, and thereafter, a leave of


absence on account of a period of qualified military service in the


uniformed services of the United States within the meaning of


Section 414(u)(5) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, followed by a return to employment with the participating


employer within ninety (90) days after completion of the period of


service may be eligible for credited service under this System.


Notwithstanding any provision of this plan to the contrary,


contributions, benefits and service credit with respect to qualified


military service will be allowed in accordance with Section 414(u)


of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.



Req. No. 515 Page 18


G. 1. An active member of the Oklahoma Public Employees


Retirement System may receive credit for those years of service


accumulated by the member while a member of the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma if:


a. the member is an active member of the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System,


b. the member provides notice to the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma and the Oklahoma Public Employees


Retirement System of the member’s election to transfer


such retirement credit. The notice shall include a


list of the years to be transferred, and


c. the member is not receiving or eligible to receive


retirement credit or benefits from such service in any


other public retirement system, notwithstanding the


years of service sought to be transferred under this


subsection.


Members electing to take advantage of the transfer authorized by


this subsection who are receiving or eligible to receive retirement


credit or benefits from such service in any other public retirement


system shall have all service credit with the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma canceled which is not transferred to the Oklahoma


Public Employees Retirement System or used as a cash offset in such


a transfer pursuant to subparagraph d of paragraph 2 of this


subsection. Service credit transferred to the Teachers’ Retirement

Req. No. 515 Page 19


System of Oklahoma under this subsection shall also be canceled with


the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.


2. For purposes of this subsection, the “sending system” shall


mean the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma. The “receiving


system” shall mean the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.


a. Within thirty (30) days after notification of an


intent to transfer is received by the sending system,


the sending system shall, according to its own rules


and regulations:


(1) for members who have vested with the sending


system, determine the present value of the


member’s earned benefits attributable to the


years of service sought to be transferred,


discounted according to the member’s age at the


time of transfer and computed as of the earliest


age at which the member would be able to retire.


Such computation shall assume an unreduced


benefit and be computed using interest and


mortality assumptions consistent with the


actuarial assumptions adopted by the Board of


Trustees for purposes of preparing the annual


actuarial evaluation but shall not make any


projections regarding future salary. For vested


employees the sending system shall use the

Req. No. 515 Page 20


product of this calculation for purposes of


determining the transfer fee to be paid by the


employee under subparagraph c of this paragraph


so long as it is greater than the product of the


calculation in this division, and


(2) determine the sum of the employee and employer


contributions applicable to the years of service


sought to be transferred plus interest consistent


with the actuarial assumptions adopted by the


Board of Trustees for purposes of preparing the


annual actuarial evaluation. For all nonvested


members, and for vested members if the product of


this calculation is greater than the product of


the calculation in division (1) of this


subparagraph, the sending system shall use the


product of this calculation for purposes of


determining the amount to be transferred by the


sending system under subparagraph c of this


paragraph and any transfer fee to be paid by the


members under subparagraph d of this paragraph.


b. Within thirty (30) days after notification of an


intent to transfer is received by the receiving


system, the receiving system shall determine,


according to the system’s own rules and regulations,

Req. No. 515 Page 21


the present value of the member’s incremental


projected benefits discounted according to the


member’s age at the time of the transfer. Incremental


projected benefits shall be the difference between the


projected benefit the member would receive without


transferring the service credit and the projected


benefit after transfer of service credit computed as


of the earliest age at which the member would be able


to retire. Such computation shall assume an unreduced


benefit and be computed using interest, salary


projections and mortality assumptions consistent with


the actuarial assumptions adopted by the Board of


Trustees for purposes of preparing the annual


actuarial evaluation.


c. The sending system shall, within sixty (60) days from


the date notification of an intent to transfer is


received by the sending system, transfer to the


receiving system the amount determined in subparagraph


a of this paragraph. Except, if the cost under


subparagraph a of this paragraph for the same years of


service to the sending system is greater than the


actuarial value of the incremental benefit in the


receiving system, as established in subparagraph b of


this paragraph, the sending system shall send the

Req. No. 515 Page 22


receiving system an amount equal to the actuarial


value of the incremental projected benefit in the


receiving system.


d. In order to receive the credit provided for in


paragraph 1 of this subsection, if the cost of the


actuarial value of the incremental benefit to the


receiving system is greater than the cost as


calculated under subparagraph a of this paragraph for


the same years of service to the sending system as


established in subparagraphs a and b of this


paragraph, the employee shall elect to:


(1) pay any difference to receive full credit for the


years sought to be transferred, or


(2) receive prorated service credit for only the


amount received from the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma pursuant to this subsection.


Such an election shall be made in writing, filed with


the System prior to receiving the credit provided for


in paragraph 1 of this subsection, and shall be


irrevocable.


3. Within sixty (60) days of successfully completing all of the


requirements for transfer under this subsection, the sending system


shall pay the receiving system any amount due under this subsection.


Within sixty (60) days of successfully completing all of the

Req. No. 515 Page 23


requirements for transfer under this subsection, the member shall


pay the receiving system any amount due under this subsection. In


the event that the member is unable to pay the transfer fee provided


for in this subsection by the due date, the Board of Trustees of the


receiving system shall permit the member to amortize the transfer


fee over a period not to exceed sixty (60) months. The payments


shall be made by payroll deductions unless the Board of Trustees


permits an alternate payment source. The amortization shall include


interest in an amount not to exceed the actuarially assumed interest


rate adopted by the Board of Trustees for investment earnings each


year. Any member who ceases to make payment, terminates, retires or


dies before completing the payments provided for in this section


shall receive prorated service credit for only those payments made,


unless the unpaid balance is paid by the member, his or her estate


or successor in interest within six (6) months after the member’s


death, termination of employment or retirement; provided, no


retirement benefits shall be payable until the unpaid balance is


paid, unless said the member or beneficiary affirmatively waives the


additional six-month period in which to pay the unpaid balance.


4. Years of service transferred pursuant to this subsection


shall be used both in determining the member’s retirement benefit


and in determining the years of service for retirement and/or and


vesting purposes. Years of service rendered as a member of the


Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma prior to July 1, 1992, if

Req. No. 515 Page 24


any, shall be deemed to be years of service rendered as a member of


the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System prior to July 1,


1992, and shall qualify such person as a member of the Oklahoma


Public Employees Retirement System before July 1, 1992.


5. Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 17-104 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes, members electing to take advantage of


the transfer authorized by this subsection who have withdrawn their


contributions from the sending system shall remit to the sending


system the amount of the accumulated contributions the member has


withdrawn plus simple interest of ten percent (10%) per annum prior


to making such election or the election shall be deemed invalid and


the transfer shall be canceled. If such an election is deemed


invalid and the transfer is canceled, the accumulated contribution


remitted to the sending system by the member who originally withdrew


their contributions shall be returned to the member. The member’s


rights and obligations regarding any service credit reestablished in


the sending system due to a failure to satisfy the requirements of


this subsection shall be determined by the sending system in


accordance with Section 17-101 et seq. of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


6. If any member fails for any reason to satisfy the


requirements of this subsection, the election to transfer retirement


credit shall be void and of no effect, and any retirement credited


as a result of this transfer shall be canceled. If such retirement

Req. No. 515 Page 25


credit is canceled, the years of canceled retirement credit which


were unsuccessfully transferred to the receiving system from the


sending system shall be reestablished in the sending system. The


member’s rights and obligations regarding any retirement credit


reestablished in the sending system due to a failure to satisfy the


requirements of this subsection shall be determined by the sending


system in accordance with Section 17-101 et seq. of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


7. The Board of Trustees shall promulgate such rules as are


necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.


H. 1. A member of the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma


whose last service with the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma


was with an entity or institution within The Oklahoma State System


of Higher Education, State Board of Education, State Board of Career


and Technology Education, Oklahoma Department of Career and


Technology Education, Oklahoma School of Science and Mathematics,


Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science and Technology, State


Department of Rehabilitation Services, Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education, Department of Corrections, State Department of


Education, Oklahoma Board of Private Vocational Schools, Board of


Regents of Oklahoma Colleges, Oklahoma Student Loan Authority, or


the Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma, may elect to receive


credit for those years of service accumulated by the member in the


Teachers’ Retirement System of Oklahoma, pursuant to this

Req. No. 515 Page 26


subsection. A member shall be eligible to elect to transfer credit


for such years of service from the Teachers’ Retirement System of


Oklahoma to the Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System if:


a. the member is an active member of the Oklahoma Public


Employees Retirement System,


b. the member provides notice to the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma and the Oklahoma Public Employees


Retirement System of the member’s election to transfer


such retirement credit. The notice shall include a


list of the years to be transferred, and


c. the member is not receiving or eligible to receive


retirement credit or benefits from such service in any


other public retirement system, notwithstanding the


years of service sought to be transferred under this


subsection.


Members electing to take advantage of the transfer authorized by


this subsection shall have all service credit with the Teachers’


Retirement System of Oklahoma canceled which is transferred to the


Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.


2. For purposes of this subsection, the “sending system”


sending system shall mean the Teachers’ Retirement System of


Oklahoma. The “receiving system” receiving system shall mean the


Oklahoma Public Employees Retirement System.



Req. No. 515 Page 27


Within thirty (30) days after notification of an intent to transfer


is received by the sending system, the sending system shall,


according to its own rules, send to the receiving system all


employer and employee contributions made on behalf of the member


which were made to the sending system plus an additional amount of


earnings based on the actuarial assumed rate of the sending system.


Upon receipt of these contributions by the receiving system, the


receiving system shall give credit to the transferring member in an


amount equal to the years of service accrued in the sending system.


3. If the transferring member’s normal retirement date


calculation is based upon the sum of the member’s age and number of


years of credited service totaling eighty (80) in the sending


system, then the member shall retain such calculation in the


receiving system.


4. The Board of Trustees shall promulgate such rules as are


necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.


I. A member of the System in the employment of the Governor,


the Senate or the House of Representatives, on or after July 1,


1999, may make an election prior to December 31, 2000, which shall


be irrevocable and on a form prescribed for such purpose by the


System, to continue participation in the System upon becoming


employed by a participating employer of the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma. The Board shall promulgate all rules necessary


to implement the provisions of this subsection.

Req. No. 515 Page 28


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-515 RD 1/19/2025 5:45:20 AM











































Req. No. 515 Page 29